Utah statutes.
63C-11-302.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The commission shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a renewal cycle established by rule.

(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of compliance with renewal requirements established by rule by the commission.

(3)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with the rules established by the commission.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 369, 2009 General Session

